South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3657.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 27, Chapter 7, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-7-3445. Hospital attending physicians must consult with any specialist physician treating a patient upon the request of the patient, the patient's family, or any other person authorized to make healthcare decisions on behalf of the patient. For purposes of this section, a "specialist physician" means a physician with additional training regarding a specific area of medicine or group of patients, such as cardiology, nephrology, or geriatrics. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----